Missouri, session 2026, HB1784.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 166.700, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 166.700, to read as follows:
166.700. As used in sections 166.700 to 166.720, the following terms mean:
(1) "Curriculum", a complete course of study for a particular content area or grade
level, including any supplemental materials;
(2) "District", the same meaning as used in section 160.011;
(3) "Educational assistance organization", the same meaning as used in section
135.712;
(4) "Illegal alien", any person who is not lawfully present in the United States or any
person who gained illegal entry into the United States;
(5) "Parent", the same meaning as used in section 135.712;
(6) "Private school", a school that is not a part of the public school system of the state
of Missouri and that charges tuition for the rendering of elementary or secondary educational
services;
(7) "Program", the same meaning as used in section 135.712;
(8) "Qualified school", an FPE school or any of the following entities that is
incorporated in Missouri and that does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, or national
origin:
(a) A charter school as defined in section 160.400;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1784 2
(b) A private school;
(c) A public school as defined in section 160.011; or
(d) A public or private virtual school;
(9) "Qualified student", any elementary or secondary school student who is a resident
of this state, who is not an illegal alien, and who:
(a) Has an approved "individualized education [plan] program" (IEP) developed
under the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), 20 U.S.C. Section 1400
et seq., as amended; or
(b) Is a member of a household whose total annual income does not exceed an amount
equal to three hundred percent of the income standard used to qualify for free and reduced
price lunches[, and that meets at least one of the following qualifications:
a. Attended a public school as a full-time student for at least one semester during the
previous twelve months;
b. Is a child who is eligible to begin kindergarten or first grade under sections 160.051
to 160.055; or
c. Is a sibling of a qualified student who received a scholarship grant in the previous
school year and will receive a scholarship grant in the current school year].
✔